Missouri, session 2026, SB1070.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Sections 99.820, 99.845, 208.009, 285.530, and
2 570.223, RSMo, are repealed and thirteen new sections enacted
3 in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 67.5200, 99.820,
4 99.845, 208.009, 217.155, 285.530, 362.103, 544.680, 544.700,
5 570.223, 577.678, 650.655, and 650.660, to read as follows:
1 67.5200. 1. A political subdivision of the state
2 shall not issue a license to an individual if the individual
3 does not provide documentation of citizenship or lawful
4 presence in this country by presenting any of the following
5 documents to the political subdivision indicating that the
6 individual's presence in the United States is authorized
7 under federal law:
8 (1) A Missouri driver's license or a Missouri
9 nondriver's license;
10 (2) A driver's license issued by a state that verifies
11 lawful presence in the United States;
12 (3) A birth certificate or delayed birth certificate
13 issued in any state, territory, or possession of the United
14 States;
15 (4) A United States certificate of birth abroad;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1070 2
16 (5) A United States passport;
17 (6) A foreign passport with a United States visa;
18 (7) An I-94 form with a photograph;
19 (8) A United States citizenship and immigration
20 services employment authorization document or refugee travel
21 document;
22 (9) A United States certificate of naturalization;
23 (10) A United States certificate of citizenship;
24 (11) A tribal certificate of Indian blood;
25 (12) A tribal or bureau of Indian affairs affidavit of
26 birth;
27 (13) Any other license that is issued by the federal
28 government, any other state government, an agency of this
29 state, or a political subdivision of this state that
30 requires proof of citizenship or lawful alien status before
31 issuing the license.
32 2. This section does not apply to an individual if
33 either:
34 (1) Both of the following apply:
35 (a) The individual is a citizen of a foreign country
36 or, if at the time of application, the individual resides in
37 a foreign country; and
38 (b) The benefits that are related to the license do
39 not require the individual to be present in the United
40 States in order to receive those benefits; or
41 (2) All of the following apply:
42 (a) The individual is a resident of another state;
43 (b) The individual holds an equivalent license in that
44 other state and the equivalent license is of the same type
45 being sought in this state; and

SB 1070 3
46 (c) The individual seeks the license to comply with
47 this state's licensing laws and not to establish residency
48 in this state.
49 3. If, pursuant to subsection 1 of this section, an
50 individual has affirmatively established citizenship of the
51 United States on a form of nonexpiring work authorization
52 issued by the federal government, the individual, on renewal
53 or reinstatement of a license, is not required to provide
54 subsequent documentation of that status.
55 4. If, on renewal or reinstatement of a license, an
56 individual holds a limited form of work authorization issued
57 by the federal government that has expired, the individual
58 shall provide documentation of that status.
59 5. If a document listed in subsection 1 of this
60 section, other than subdivision (13) of such subsection,
61 does not contain a photograph of the individual, the
62 individual shall also present a government-issued document
63 that contains a photograph of the individual.
64 6. For the purposes of this section, the term
65 "license" means any permit, certificate, approval,
66 registration, charter, or similar form of authorization that
67 is required by law and that is issued by any political
68 subdivision for the purposes of operating a business or to
69 an individual who provides a service to any person where the
70 license is necessary in performing that service.
1 99.820. 1. A municipality may:
2 (1) By ordinance introduced in the governing body of
3 the municipality within fourteen to ninety days from the
4 completion of the hearing required in section 99.825,
5 approve redevelopment plans and redevelopment projects, and
6 designate redevelopment project areas pursuant to the notice
7 and hearing requirements of sections 99.800 to 99.865. No

SB 1070 4
8 redevelopment project shall be approved unless a
9 redevelopment plan has been approved and a redevelopment
10 area has been designated prior to or concurrently with the
11 approval of such redevelopment project and the area selected
12 for the redevelopment project shall include only those
13 parcels of real property and improvements thereon directly
14 and substantially benefitted by the proposed redevelopment
15 project improvements;
16 (2) Make and enter into all contracts necessary or
17 incidental to the implementation and furtherance of its
18 redevelopment plan or project;
19 (3) Pursuant to a redevelopment plan, subject to any
20 constitutional limitations, acquire by purchase, donation,
21 lease or, as part of a redevelopment project, eminent
22 domain, own, convey, lease, mortgage, or dispose of land and
23 other property, real or personal, or rights or interests
24 therein, and grant or acquire licenses, easements and
25 options with respect thereto, all in the manner and at such
26 price the municipality or the commission determines is
27 reasonably necessary to achieve the objectives of the
28 redevelopment plan. No conveyance, lease, mortgage,
29 disposition of land or other property, acquired by the
30 municipality, or agreement relating to the development of
31 the property shall be made except upon the adoption of an
32 ordinance by the governing body of the municipality. Each
33 municipality or its commission shall establish written
34 procedures relating to bids and proposals for implementation
35 of the redevelopment projects. Furthermore, no conveyance,
36 lease, mortgage, or other disposition of land or agreement
37 relating to the development of property shall be made
38 without making public disclosure of the terms of the
39 disposition and all bids and proposals made in response to

SB 1070 5
40 the municipality's request, and no conveyance, lease,
41 mortgage, or other disposition of land or agreement relating
42 to the development of property shall be made to an alien who
43 is unlawfully present in this country by the municipality or
44 any developer or other entity located within the
45 redevelopment area. Such procedures for obtaining such bids
46 and proposals shall provide reasonable opportunity for any
47 person to submit alternative proposals or bids;
48 (4) Within a redevelopment area, clear any area by
49 demolition or removal of existing buildings and structures;
50 (5) Within a redevelopment area, renovate,
51 rehabilitate, or construct any structure or building;
52 (6) Install, repair, construct, reconstruct, or
53 relocate streets, utilities, and site improvements essential
54 to the preparation of the redevelopment area for use in
55 accordance with a redevelopment plan;
56 (7) Within a redevelopment area, fix, charge, and
57 collect fees, rents, and other charges for the use of any
58 building or property owned or leased by it or any part
59 thereof, or facility therein;
60 (8) Accept grants, guarantees, and donations of
61 property, labor, or other things of value from a public or
62 private source for use within a redevelopment area;
63 (9) Acquire and construct public facilities within a
64 redevelopment area;
65 (10) Incur redevelopment costs and issue obligations;
66 (11) Make payment in lieu of taxes, or a portion
67 thereof, to taxing districts;
68 (12) Disburse surplus funds from the special
69 allocation fund to taxing districts as follows:
70 (a) Such surplus payments in lieu of taxes shall be
71 distributed to taxing districts within the redevelopment

SB 1070 6
72 area which impose ad valorem taxes on a basis that is
73 proportional to the current collections of revenue which
74 each taxing district receives from real property in the
75 redevelopment area;
76 (b) Surplus economic activity taxes shall be
77 distributed to taxing districts in the redevelopment area
78 which impose economic activity taxes, on a basis that is
79 proportional to the amount of such economic activity taxes
80 the taxing district would have received from the
81 redevelopment area had tax increment financing not been
82 adopted;
83 (c) Surplus revenues, other than payments in lieu of
84 taxes and economic activity taxes, deposited in the special
85 allocation fund, shall be distributed on a basis that is
86 proportional to the total receipt of such other revenues in
87 such account in the year prior to disbursement;
88 (13) If any member of the governing body of the
89 municipality, a member of a commission established pursuant
90 to subsection 2 or 3 of this section, or an employee or
91 consultant of the municipality, involved in the planning and
92 preparation of a redevelopment plan, or redevelopment
93 project for a redevelopment area or proposed redevelopment
94 area, owns or controls an interest, direct or indirect, in
95 any property included in any redevelopment area, or proposed
96 redevelopment area, which property is designated to be
97 acquired or improved pursuant to a redevelopment project, he
98 or she shall disclose the same in writing to the clerk of
99 the municipality, and shall also so disclose the dates,
100 terms, and conditions of any disposition of any such
101 interest, which disclosures shall be acknowledged by the
102 governing body of the municipality and entered upon the
103 minutes books of the governing body of the municipality. If

SB 1070 7
104 an individual holds such an interest, then that individual
105 shall refrain from any further official involvement in
106 regard to such redevelopment plan, redevelopment project or
107 redevelopment area, from voting on any matter pertaining to
108 such redevelopment plan, redevelopment project or
109 redevelopment area, or communicating with other members
110 concerning any matter pertaining to that redevelopment plan,
111 redevelopment project or redevelopment area. Furthermore,
112 no such member or employee shall acquire any interest,
113 direct or indirect, in any property in a redevelopment area
114 or proposed redevelopment area after either (a) such
115 individual obtains knowledge of such plan or project, or (b)
116 first public notice of such plan, project or area pursuant
117 to section 99.830, whichever first occurs;
118 (14) Charge as a redevelopment cost the reasonable
119 costs incurred by its clerk or other official in
120 administering the redevelopment project. The charge for the
121 clerk's or other official's costs shall be determined by the
122 municipality based on a recommendation from the commission,
123 created pursuant to this section.
124 2. Prior to adoption of an ordinance approving the
125 designation of a redevelopment area or approving a
126 redevelopment plan or redevelopment project, the
127 municipality shall create a commission of nine persons if
128 the municipality is a county or a city not within a county
129 and not a first class county with a charter form of
130 government with a population in excess of nine hundred
131 thousand, and eleven persons if the municipality is not a
132 county and not in a first class county with a charter form
133 of government having a population of more than nine hundred
134 thousand, and twelve persons if the municipality is located
135 in or is a first class county with a charter form of

SB 1070 8
136 government having a population of more than nine hundred
137 thousand, to be appointed as follows:
138 (1) In all municipalities two members shall be
139 appointed by the school boards whose districts are included
140 within the redevelopment plan or redevelopment area. Such
141 members shall be appointed in any manner agreed upon by the
142 affected districts;
143 (2) In all municipalities one member shall be
144 appointed, in any manner agreed upon by the affected
145 districts, to represent all other districts levying ad
146 valorem taxes within the area selected for a redevelopment
147 project or the redevelopment area, excluding representatives
148 of the governing body of the municipality;
149 (3) In all municipalities six members shall be
150 appointed by the chief elected officer of the municipality,
151 with the consent of the majority of the governing body of
152 the municipality;
153 (4) In all municipalities which are not counties and
154 not in a first class county with a charter form of
155 government having a population in excess of nine hundred
156 thousand, two members shall be appointed by the county of
157 such municipality in the same manner as members are
158 appointed in subdivision (3) of this subsection;
159 (5) In a municipality which is a county with a charter
160 form of government having a population in excess of nine
161 hundred thousand, three members shall be appointed by the
162 cities in the county which have tax increment financing
163 districts in a manner in which the cities shall agree;
164 (6) In a municipality which is located in the first
165 class county with a charter form of government having a
166 population in excess of nine hundred thousand, three members
167 shall be appointed by the county of such municipality in the

SB 1070 9
168 same manner as members are appointed in subdivision (3) of
169 this subsection;
170 (7) At the option of the members appointed by the
171 municipality, the members who are appointed by the school
172 boards and other taxing districts may serve on the
173 commission for a term to coincide with the length of time a
174 redevelopment project, redevelopment plan or designation of
175 a redevelopment area is considered for approval by the
176 commission, or for a definite term pursuant to this
177 subdivision. If the members representing school districts
178 and other taxing districts are appointed for a term
179 coinciding with the length of time a redevelopment project,
180 plan or area is approved, such term shall terminate upon
181 final approval of the project, plan or designation of the
182 area by the governing body of the municipality. Thereafter
183 the commission shall consist of the six members appointed by
184 the municipality, except that members representing school
185 boards and other taxing districts shall be appointed as
186 provided in this section prior to any amendments to any
187 redevelopment plans, redevelopment projects or designation
188 of a redevelopment area. If any school district or other
189 taxing jurisdiction fails to appoint members of the
190 commission within thirty days of receipt of written notice
191 of a proposed redevelopment plan, redevelopment project or
192 designation of a redevelopment area, the remaining members
193 may proceed to exercise the power of the commission. Of the
194 members first appointed by the municipality, two shall be
195 designated to serve for terms of two years, two shall be
196 designated to serve for a term of three years and two shall
197 be designated to serve for a term of four years from the
198 date of such initial appointments. Thereafter, the members
199 appointed by the municipality shall serve for a term of four

SB 1070 10
200 years, except that all vacancies shall be filled for
201 unexpired terms in the same manner as were the original
202 appointments. Members appointed by the county executive or
203 presiding commissioner prior to August 28, 2008, shall
204 continue their service on the commission established in
205 subsection 3 of this section without further appointment
206 unless the county executive or presiding commissioner
207 appoints a new member or members.
208 3. Beginning August 28, 2008:
209 (1) In lieu of a commission created under subsection 2
210 of this section, any city, town, or village in a county with
211 a charter form of government and with more than one million
212 inhabitants, in a county with a charter form of government
213 and with more than two hundred fifty thousand but fewer than
214 three hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, in a county of the
215 first classification with more than one hundred eighty-five
216 thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants, or
217 in a county of the first classification with more than
218 ninety-two thousand but fewer than one hundred one thousand
219 inhabitants shall, prior to adoption of an ordinance
220 approving the designation of a redevelopment area or
221 approving a redevelopment plan or redevelopment project,
222 create a commission consisting of twelve persons to be
223 appointed as follows:
224 (a) Six members appointed either by the county
225 executive or presiding commissioner; notwithstanding any
226 provision of law to the contrary, no approval by the
227 county's governing body shall be required;
228 (b) Three members appointed by the cities, towns, or
229 villages in the county which have tax increment financing
230 districts in a manner in which the chief elected officials
231 of such cities, towns, or villages agree;

SB 1070 11
232 (c) Two members appointed by the school boards whose
233 districts are included in the county in a manner in which
234 the school boards agree; and
235 (d) One member to represent all other districts
236 levying ad valorem taxes in the proposed redevelopment area
237 in a manner in which all such districts agree.
238 No city, town, or village subject to this subsection shall
239 create or maintain a commission under subsection 2 of this
240 section, except as necessary to complete a public hearing
241 for which notice under section 99.830 has been provided
242 prior to August 28, 2008, and to vote or make
243 recommendations relating to redevelopment plans,
244 redevelopment projects, or designation of redevelopment
245 areas, or amendments thereto that were the subject of such
246 public hearing;
247 (2) Members appointed to the commission created under
248 this subsection, except those six members appointed by
249 either the county executive or presiding commissioner, shall
250 serve on the commission for a term to coincide with the
251 length of time a redevelopment project, redevelopment plan,
252 or designation of a redevelopment area is considered for
253 approval by the commission. The six members appointed by
254 either the county executive or the presiding commissioner
255 shall serve on all such commissions until replaced. The
256 city, town, or village that creates a commission under this
257 subsection shall send notice thereof by certified mail to
258 the county executive or presiding commissioner, to the
259 school districts whose boundaries include any portion of the
260 proposed redevelopment area, and to the other taxing
261 districts whose boundaries include any portion of the
262 proposed redevelopment area. The city, town, or village

SB 1070 12
263 that creates the commission shall also be solely responsible
264 for notifying all other cities, towns, and villages in the
265 county that have tax increment financing districts and shall
266 exercise all administrative functions of the commission.
267 The school districts receiving notice from the city, town,
268 or village shall be solely responsible for notifying the
269 other school districts within the county of the formation of
270 the commission. If the county, school board, or other
271 taxing district fails to appoint members to the commission
272 within thirty days after the city, town, or village sends
273 the written notice, as provided herein, that it has convened
274 such a commission or within thirty days of the expiration of
275 any such member's term, the remaining duly appointed members
276 of the commission may exercise the full powers of the
277 commission.
278 4. (1) Any commission created under this section,
279 subject to approval of the governing body of the
280 municipality, may exercise the powers enumerated in sections
281 99.800 to 99.865, except final approval of plans, projects
282 and designation of redevelopment areas. The commission
283 shall hold public hearings and provide notice pursuant to
284 sections 99.825 and 99.830.
285 (2) Any commission created under subsection 2 of this
286 section shall vote on all proposed redevelopment plans,
287 redevelopment projects and designations of redevelopment
288 areas, and amendments thereto, within thirty days following
289 completion of the hearing on any such plan, project or
290 designation and shall make recommendations to the governing
291 body within ninety days of the hearing referred to in
292 section 99.825 concerning the adoption of or amendment to
293 redevelopment plans and redevelopment projects and the
294 designation of redevelopment areas. The requirements of

SB 1070 13
295 subsection 2 of this section and this subsection shall not
296 apply to redevelopment projects upon which the required
297 hearings have been duly held prior to August 31, 1991.
298 (3) Any commission created under subsection 3 of this
299 section shall, within fifteen days of the receipt of a
300 redevelopment plan meeting the minimum requirements of
301 section 99.810, as determined by counsel to the city, town,
302 or village creating the commission and a request by the
303 applicable city, town, or village for a public hearing, fix
304 a time and place for the public hearing referred to in
305 section 99.825. The public hearing shall be held no later
306 than seventy-five days from the commission's receipt of such
307 redevelopment plan and request for public hearing. The
308 commission shall vote and make recommendations to the
309 governing body of the city, town, or village requesting the
310 public hearing on all proposed redevelopment plans,
311 redevelopment projects, and designations of redevelopment
312 areas, and amendments thereto within thirty days following
313 the completion of the public hearing. A recommendation of
314 approval shall only be deemed to occur if a majority of the
315 commissioners voting on such plan, project, designation, or
316 amendment thereto vote for approval. A tied vote shall be
317 considered a recommendation in opposition. If the
318 commission fails to vote within thirty days following the
319 completion of the public hearing referred to in section
320 99.825 concerning the proposed redevelopment plan,
321 redevelopment project, or designation of redevelopment area,
322 or amendments thereto, such plan, project, designation, or
323 amendment thereto shall be deemed rejected by the commission.
324 5. It shall be the policy of the state that each
325 redevelopment plan or project of a municipality be carried
326 out with full transparency to the public. The records of

SB 1070 14
327 the tax increment financing commission including, but not
328 limited to, commission votes and actions, meeting minutes,
329 summaries of witness testimony, data, and reports submitted
330 to the commission shall be retained by the governing body of
331 the municipality that created the commission and shall be
332 made available to the public in accordance with chapter 610.
1 99.845. 1. A municipality, either at the time a
2 redevelopment project is approved or, in the event a
3 municipality has undertaken acts establishing a
4 redevelopment plan and redevelopment project and has
5 designated a redevelopment area after the passage and
6 approval of sections 99.800 to 99.865 but prior to August
7 13, 1982, which acts are in conformance with the procedures
8 of sections 99.800 to 99.865, may adopt tax increment
9 allocation financing by passing an ordinance providing that
10 after the total equalized assessed valuation of the taxable
11 real property in a redevelopment project exceeds the
12 certified total initial equalized assessed valuation of the
13 taxable real property in the redevelopment project, the ad
14 valorem taxes, and payments in lieu of taxes, if any,
15 arising from the levies upon taxable real property in such
16 redevelopment project by taxing districts and tax rates
17 determined in the manner provided in subsection 2 of section
18 99.855 each year after the effective date of the ordinance
19 until redevelopment costs have been paid shall be divided as
20 follows:
21 (1) That portion of taxes, penalties and interest
22 levied upon each taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of
23 real property which is attributable to the initial equalized
24 assessed value of each such taxable lot, block, tract, or
25 parcel of real property in the area selected for the
26 redevelopment project shall be allocated to and, when

SB 1070 15
27 collected, shall be paid by the county collector to the
28 respective affected taxing districts in the manner required
29 by law in the absence of the adoption of tax increment
30 allocation financing;
31 (2) (a) Payments in lieu of taxes attributable to the
32 increase in the current equalized assessed valuation of each
33 taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property in the
34 area selected for the redevelopment project and any
35 applicable penalty and interest over and above the initial
36 equalized assessed value of each such unit of property in
37 the area selected for the redevelopment project shall be
38 allocated to and, when collected, shall be paid to the
39 municipal treasurer who shall deposit such payment in lieu
40 of taxes into a special fund called the "Special Allocation
41 Fund" of the municipality for the purpose of paying
42 redevelopment costs and obligations incurred in the payment
43 thereof. Beginning August 28, 2014, if the voters in a
44 taxing district vote to approve an increase in such taxing
45 district's levy rate for ad valorem tax on real property,
46 any additional revenues generated within an existing
47 redevelopment project area that are directly attributable to
48 the newly voter-approved incremental increase in such taxing
49 district's levy rate shall not be considered payments in
50 lieu of taxes subject to deposit into a special allocation
51 fund without the consent of such taxing district. Revenues
52 will be considered directly attributable to the newly voter-
53 approved incremental increase to the extent that they are
54 generated from the difference between the taxing district's
55 actual levy rate currently imposed and the maximum voter-
56 approved levy rate at the time that the redevelopment
57 project was adopted. Payments in lieu of taxes which are
58 due and owing shall constitute a lien against the real

SB 1070 16
59 estate of the redevelopment project from which they are
60 derived and shall be collected in the same manner as the
61 real property tax, including the assessment of penalties and
62 interest where applicable. The municipality may, in the
63 ordinance, pledge the funds in the special allocation fund
64 for the payment of such costs and obligations and provide
65 for the collection of payments in lieu of taxes, the lien of
66 which may be foreclosed in the same manner as a special
67 assessment lien as provided in section 88.861. No part of
68 the current equalized assessed valuation of each lot, block,
69 tract, or parcel of property in the area selected for the
70 redevelopment project attributable to any increase above the
71 total initial equalized assessed value of such properties
72 shall be used in calculating the general state school aid
73 formula provided for in section 163.031 until such time as
74 all redevelopment costs have been paid as provided for in
75 this section and section 99.850.
76 (b) Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to
77 the contrary, for purposes of determining the limitation on
78 indebtedness of local government pursuant to Article VI,
79 Section 26(b) of the Missouri Constitution, the current
80 equalized assessed value of the property in an area selected
81 for redevelopment attributable to the increase above the
82 total initial equalized assessed valuation shall be included
83 in the value of taxable tangible property as shown on the
84 last completed assessment for state or county purposes.
85 (c) The county assessor shall include the current
86 assessed value of all property within the taxing district in
87 the aggregate valuation of assessed property entered upon
88 the assessor's book and verified pursuant to section
89 137.245, and such value shall be utilized for the purpose of

SB 1070 17
90 the debt limitation on local government pursuant to Article
91 VI, Section 26(b) of the Missouri Constitution;
92 (3) For purposes of this section, "levies upon taxable
93 real property in such redevelopment project by taxing
94 districts" shall not include the blind pension fund tax
95 levied under the authority of Article III, Section 38(b) of
96 the Missouri Constitution, or the merchants' and
97 manufacturers' inventory replacement tax levied under the
98 authority of subsection 2 of Section 6 of Article X of the
99 Missouri Constitution, except in redevelopment project areas
100 in which tax increment financing has been adopted by
101 ordinance pursuant to a plan approved by vote of the
102 governing body of the municipality taken after August 13,
103 1982, and before January 1, 1998.
104 2. In addition to the payments in lieu of taxes
105 described in subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this
106 section, for redevelopment plans and projects adopted or
107 redevelopment projects approved by ordinance after July 12,
108 1990, and prior to August 31, 1991, fifty percent of the
109 total additional revenue from taxes, penalties and interest
110 imposed by the municipality, or other taxing districts,
111 which are generated by economic activities within the area
112 of the redevelopment project over the amount of such taxes
113 generated by economic activities within the area of the
114 redevelopment project in the calendar year prior to the
115 adoption of the redevelopment project by ordinance, while
116 tax increment financing remains in effect, but excluding
117 taxes imposed on sales or charges for sleeping rooms paid by
118 transient guests of hotels and motels, taxes levied pursuant
119 to section 70.500, licenses, fees or special assessments
120 other than payments in lieu of taxes and any penalty and
121 interest thereon, or, effective January 1, 1998, taxes

SB 1070 18
122 levied pursuant to section 94.660, for the purpose of public
123 transportation, shall be allocated to, and paid by the local
124 political subdivision collecting officer to the treasurer or
125 other designated financial officer of the municipality, who
126 shall deposit such funds in a separate segregated account
127 within the special allocation fund. Any provision of an
128 agreement, contract or covenant entered into prior to July
129 12, 1990, between a municipality and any other political
130 subdivision which provides for an appropriation of other
131 municipal revenues to the special allocation fund shall be
132 and remain enforceable.
133 3. In addition to the payments in lieu of taxes
134 described in subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this
135 section, for redevelopment plans and projects adopted or
136 redevelopment projects approved by ordinance after August
137 31, 1991, fifty percent of the total additional revenue from
138 taxes, penalties and interest which are imposed by the
139 municipality or other taxing districts, and which are
140 generated by economic activities within the area of the
141 redevelopment project over the amount of such taxes
142 generated by economic activities within the area of the
143 redevelopment project in the calendar year prior to the
144 adoption of the redevelopment project by ordinance, while
145 tax increment financing remains in effect, but excluding
146 personal property taxes, taxes imposed on sales or charges
147 for sleeping rooms paid by transient guests of hotels and
148 motels, taxes levied pursuant to section 70.500, taxes
149 levied for the purpose of public transportation pursuant to
150 section 94.660, taxes imposed on sales pursuant to
151 subsection 2 of section 67.1712 for the purpose of operating
152 and maintaining a metropolitan park and recreation district,
153 licenses, fees or special assessments other than payments in

SB 1070 19
154 lieu of taxes and penalties and interest thereon, any sales
155 tax imposed by a county with a charter form of government
156 and with more than six hundred thousand but fewer than seven
157 hundred thousand inhabitants, for the purpose of sports
158 stadium improvement or levied by such county under section
159 238.410 for the purpose of the county transit authority
160 operating transportation facilities, or for redevelopment
161 plans and projects adopted or redevelopment projects
162 approved by ordinance after August 28, 2013, taxes imposed
163 on sales under and pursuant to section 67.700 or 650.399 for
164 the purpose of emergency communication systems, shall be
165 allocated to, and paid by the local political subdivision
166 collecting officer to the treasurer or other designated
167 financial officer of the municipality, who shall deposit
168 such funds in a separate segregated account within the
169 special allocation fund. Beginning August 28, 2014, if the
170 voters in a taxing district vote to approve an increase in
171 such taxing district's sales tax or use tax, other than the
172 renewal of an expiring sales or use tax, any additional
173 revenues generated within an existing redevelopment project
174 area that are directly attributable to the newly voter-
175 approved incremental increase in such taxing district's levy
176 rate shall not be considered economic activity taxes subject
177 to deposit into a special allocation fund without the
178 consent of such taxing district.
179 4. Beginning January 1, 1998, for redevelopment plans
180 and projects adopted or redevelopment projects approved by
181 ordinance and which have complied with subsections 4 to 12
182 of this section, in addition to the payments in lieu of
183 taxes and economic activity taxes described in subsections
184 1, 2 and 3 of this section, up to fifty percent of the new
185 state revenues, as defined in subsection 8 of this section,

SB 1070 20
186 estimated for the businesses within the project area and
187 identified by the municipality in the application required
188 by subsection 10 of this section, over and above the amount
189 of such taxes reported by businesses within the project area
190 as identified by the municipality in their application prior
191 to the approval of the redevelopment project by ordinance,
192 while tax increment financing remains in effect, may be
193 available for appropriation by the general assembly as
194 provided in subsection 10 of this section to the department
195 of economic development supplemental tax increment financing
196 fund, from the general revenue fund, for distribution to the
197 treasurer or other designated financial officer of the
198 municipality with approved plans or projects.
199 5. The treasurer or other designated financial officer
200 of the municipality with approved plans or projects shall
201 deposit such funds in a separate segregated account within
202 the special allocation fund established pursuant to section
203 99.805.
204 6. No transfer from the general revenue fund to the
205 Missouri supplemental tax increment financing fund shall be
206 made unless an appropriation is made from the general
207 revenue fund for that purpose. No municipality shall commit
208 any state revenues prior to an appropriation being made for
209 that project. For all redevelopment plans or projects
210 adopted or approved after December 23, 1997, appropriations
211 from the new state revenues shall not be distributed from
212 the Missouri supplemental tax increment financing fund into
213 the special allocation fund unless the municipality's
214 redevelopment plan ensures that one hundred percent of
215 payments in lieu of taxes and fifty percent of economic
216 activity taxes generated by the project shall be used for
217 eligible redevelopment project costs while tax increment

SB 1070 21
218 financing remains in effect. This account shall be separate
219 from the account into which payments in lieu of taxes are
220 deposited, and separate from the account into which economic
221 activity taxes are deposited.
222 7. In order for the redevelopment plan or project to
223 be eligible to receive the revenue described in subsection 4
224 of this section, the municipality shall comply with the
225 requirements of subsection 10 of this section prior to the
226 time the project or plan is adopted or approved by
227 ordinance. The director of the department of economic
228 development and the commissioner of the office of
229 administration may waive the requirement that the
230 municipality's application be submitted prior to the
231 redevelopment plan's or project's adoption or the
232 redevelopment plan's or project's approval by ordinance.
233 8. For purposes of this section, "new state revenues"
234 means:
235 (1) The incremental increase in the general revenue
236 portion of state sales tax revenues received pursuant to
237 section 144.020, excluding sales taxes that are
238 constitutionally dedicated, taxes deposited to the school
239 district trust fund in accordance with section 144.701,
240 sales and use taxes on motor vehicles, trailers, boats and
241 outboard motors and future sales taxes earmarked by law. In
242 no event shall the incremental increase include any amounts
243 attributable to retail sales unless the municipality or
244 authority has proven to the Missouri development finance
245 board and the department of economic development and such
246 entities have made a finding that the sales tax increment
247 attributable to retail sales is from new sources which did
248 not exist in the state during the baseline year. The
249 incremental increase in the general revenue portion of state

SB 1070 22
250 sales tax revenues for an existing or relocated facility
251 shall be the amount that current state sales tax revenue
252 exceeds the state sales tax revenue in the base year as
253 stated in the redevelopment plan as provided in subsection
254 10 of this section; or
255 (2) The state income tax withheld on behalf of new
256 employees by the employer pursuant to section 143.221 at the
257 business located within the project as identified by the
258 municipality. The state income tax withholding allowed by
259 this section shall be the municipality's estimate of the
260 amount of state income tax withheld by the employer within
261 the redevelopment area for new employees who fill new jobs
262 directly created by the tax increment financing project.
263 9. Subsection 4 of this section shall apply only to
264 the following:
265 (1) Blighted areas located in enterprise zones,
266 pursuant to sections 135.200 to 135.256, blighted areas
267 located in federal empowerment zones, or to blighted areas
268 located in central business districts or urban core areas of
269 cities which districts or urban core areas at the time of
270 approval of the project by ordinance, provided that the
271 enterprise zones, federal empowerment zones or blighted
272 areas contained one or more buildings at least fifty years
273 old; and
274 (a) Suffered from generally declining population or
275 property taxes over the twenty-year period immediately
276 preceding the area's designation as a project area by
277 ordinance; or
278 (b) Was a historic hotel located in a county of the
279 first classification without a charter form of government
280 with a population according to the most recent federal
281 decennial census in excess of one hundred fifty thousand and

SB 1070 23
282 containing a portion of a city with a population according
283 to the most recent federal decennial census in excess of
284 three hundred fifty thousand;
285 (2) Blighted areas consisting solely of the site of a
286 former automobile manufacturing plant located in any county
287 with a charter form of government and with more than nine
288 hundred fifty thousand inhabitants. For the purposes of
289 this section, "former automobile manufacturing plant" means
290 a redevelopment area containing a minimum of one hundred
291 acres, and such redevelopment area was previously used
292 primarily for the manufacture of automobiles but ceased such
293 manufacturing after the 2007 calendar year; or
294 (3) Blighted areas consisting solely of the site of a
295 former insurance company national service center containing
296 a minimum of one hundred acres located in any county with a
297 charter form of government and with more than nine hundred
298 fifty thousand inhabitants.
299 10. The initial appropriation of up to fifty percent
300 of the new state revenues authorized pursuant to subsection
301 4 of this section shall not be made to or distributed by the
302 department of economic development to a municipality until
303 all of the following conditions have been satisfied:
304 (1) The director of the department of economic
305 development or his or her designee and the commissioner of
306 the office of administration or his or her designee have
307 approved a tax increment financing application made by the
308 municipality for the appropriation of the new state
309 revenues. The municipality shall include in the application
310 the following items in addition to the items in section
311 99.810:

SB 1070 24
312 (a) The tax increment financing district or
313 redevelopment area, including the businesses identified
314 within the redevelopment area;
315 (b) The base year of state sales tax revenues or the
316 base year of state income tax withheld on behalf of existing
317 employees, reported by existing businesses within the
318 project area prior to approval of the redevelopment project;
319 (c) The estimate of the incremental increase in the
320 general revenue portion of state sales tax revenue or the
321 estimate for the state income tax withheld by the employer
322 on behalf of new employees expected to fill new jobs created
323 within the redevelopment area after redevelopment;
324 (d) The official statement of any bond issue pursuant
325 to this subsection after December 23, 1997;
326 (e) An affidavit that is signed by the developer or
327 developers attesting that the provisions of subdivision (1)
328 of subsection 1 of section 99.810 have been met and
329 specifying that the redevelopment area would not be
330 reasonably anticipated to be developed without the
331 appropriation of the new state revenues;
332 (f) The cost-benefit analysis required by section
333 99.810 includes a study of the fiscal impact on the state of
334 Missouri;
335 (g) The statement of election between the use of the
336 incremental increase of the general revenue portion of the
337 state sales tax revenues or the state income tax withheld by
338 employers on behalf of new employees who fill new jobs
339 created in the redevelopment area;
340 (h) The name, street and mailing address, and phone
341 number of the mayor or chief executive officer of the
342 municipality;
343 (i) The street address of the development site;

SB 1070 25
344 (j) The three-digit North American Industry
345 Classification System number or numbers characterizing the
346 development project;
347 (k) The estimated development project costs;
348 (l) The anticipated sources of funds to pay such
349 development project costs;
350 (m) Evidence of the commitments to finance such
351 development project costs;
352 (n) The anticipated type and term of the sources of
353 funds to pay such development project costs;
354 (o) The anticipated type and terms of the obligations
355 to be issued;
356 (p) The most recent equalized assessed valuation of
357 the property within the development project area;
358 (q) An estimate as to the equalized assessed valuation
359 after the development project area is developed in
360 accordance with a development plan;
361 (r) The general land uses to apply in the development
362 area;
363 (s) The total number of individuals employed in the
364 development area, broken down by full-time, part-time, and
365 temporary positions;
366 (t) The total number of full-time equivalent positions
367 in the development area;
368 (u) The current gross wages, state income tax
369 withholdings, and federal income tax withholdings for
370 individuals employed in the development area;
371 (v) The total number of individuals employed in this
372 state by the corporate parent of any business benefitting
373 from public expenditures in the development area, and all
374 subsidiaries thereof, as of December thirty-first of the

SB 1070 26
375 prior fiscal year, broken down by full-time, part-time, and
376 temporary positions;
377 (w) The number of new jobs to be created by any
378 business benefitting from public expenditures in the
379 development area, broken down by full-time, part-time, and
380 temporary positions;
381 (x) The average hourly wage to be paid to all current
382 and new employees at the project site, broken down by full-
383 time, part-time, and temporary positions;
384 (y) For project sites located in a metropolitan
385 statistical area, as defined by the federal Office of
386 Management and Budget, the average hourly wage paid to
387 nonmanagerial employees in this state for the industries
388 involved at the project, as established by the United States
389 Bureau of Labor Statistics;
390 (z) For project sites located outside of metropolitan
391 statistical areas, the average weekly wage paid to
392 nonmanagerial employees in the county for industries
393 involved at the project, as established by the United States
394 Department of Commerce;
395 (aa) A list of other community and economic benefits
396 to result from the project;
397 (bb) A list of all development subsidies that any
398 business benefitting from public expenditures in the
399 development area has previously received for the project,
400 and the name of any other granting body from which such
401 subsidies are sought;
402 (cc) A list of all other public investments made or to
403 be made by this state or units of local government to
404 support infrastructure or other needs generated by the
405 project for which the funding pursuant to this section is
406 being sought;

SB 1070 27
407 (dd) A statement as to whether the development project
408 may reduce employment at any other site, within or without
409 the state, resulting from automation, merger, acquisition,
410 corporate restructuring, relocation, or other business
411 activity;
412 (ee) A statement as to whether or not the project
413 involves the relocation of work from another address and if
414 so, the number of jobs to be relocated and the address from
415 which they are to be relocated;
416 (ff) A list of competing businesses in the county
417 containing the development area and in each contiguous
418 county;
419 (gg) A market study for the development area;
420 (hh) A certification by the chief officer of the
421 applicant as to the accuracy of the development plan;
422 (ii) An affidavit that is signed by the developer or
423 developers and the chief executive officer of the
424 municipality attesting that neither the developer nor the
425 municipality leases or will lease or sell any property
426 located within the development area to an alien who is
427 unlawfully present in this country. Any appropriation
428 distributed to a municipality for a redevelopment project
429 found to be in violation of the provisions of this paragraph
430 shall be recaptured by the department of economic
431 development;
432 (2) The methodologies used in the application for
433 determining the base year and determining the estimate of
434 the incremental increase in the general revenue portion of
435 the state sales tax revenues or the state income tax
436 withheld by employers on behalf of new employees who fill
437 new jobs created in the redevelopment area shall be approved
438 by the director of the department of economic development or

SB 1070 28
439 his or her designee and the commissioner of the office of
440 administration or his or her designee. Upon approval of the
441 application, the director of the department of economic
442 development or his or her designee and the commissioner of
443 the office of administration or his or her designee shall
444 issue a certificate of approval. The department of economic
445 development may request the appropriation following
446 application approval;
447 (3) The appropriation shall be either a portion of the
448 estimate of the incremental increase in the general revenue
449 portion of state sales tax revenues in the redevelopment
450 area or a portion of the estimate of the state income tax
451 withheld by the employer on behalf of new employees who fill
452 new jobs created in the redevelopment area as indicated in
453 the municipality's application, approved by the director of
454 the department of economic development or his or her
455 designee and the commissioner of the office of
456 administration or his or her designee. At no time shall the
457 annual amount of the new state revenues approved for
458 disbursements from the Missouri supplemental tax increment
459 financing fund for redevelopment projects approved prior to
460 August 28, 2018, exceed thirty-two million dollars;
461 provided, however, that such thirty-two million dollar cap
462 shall not apply to redevelopment plans or projects initially
463 listed by name in the applicable appropriations bill after
464 August 28, 2015, which involve:
465 (a) A former automobile manufacturing plant;
466 (b) The retention of a federal employer employing over
467 two thousand geospatial intelligence jobs; or
468 (c) A health information technology employer employing
469 over seven thousand employees in the state of Missouri and
470 which is estimated to create in excess of fifteen thousand

SB 1070 29
471 new jobs with an average annual wage of more than seventy-
472 five thousand dollars.
473 At no time shall the annual amount of the new state revenues
474 for disbursements from the Missouri supplemental tax
475 increment financing fund for redevelopment plans and
476 projects eligible under the provisions of paragraph (a) of
477 this subdivision exceed four million dollars in the
478 aggregate. At no time shall the annual amount of the new
479 state revenues for disbursements from the Missouri
480 supplemental tax increment financing fund for redevelopment
481 plans and projects eligible under the provisions of
482 paragraph (b) of this subdivision exceed twelve million
483 dollars in the aggregate. To the extent a redevelopment
484 plan or project independently meets the eligibility criteria
485 set forth in both paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
486 subdivision, then at no such time shall the annual amount of
487 new state revenues for disbursements from the Missouri
488 supplemental tax increment financing fund for such eligible
489 redevelopment plan or project exceed twelve million dollars
490 in the aggregate;
491 (4) At no time shall the annual amount of the new
492 state revenues approved for disbursements from the Missouri
493 supplemental tax increment financing fund for redevelopment
494 plans or projects approved on or after August 28, 2018, and
495 before August 28, 2028, be increased by or exceed ten
496 million dollars. Any individual redevelopment plan or
497 project approved prior to August 28, 2018, which is expanded
498 with buildings of new construction shall not be increased by
499 more than three million dollars annually in excess of the
500 original previously approved maximum annual projected
501 amount. At no time shall the annual amount of the new state

SB 1070 30
502 revenues approved for disbursements from the Missouri
503 supplemental tax increment financing fund for redevelopment
504 plans or projects approved on or after August 28, 2028,
505 exceed twenty million dollars; provided, however, that such
506 ceilings shall not apply to redevelopment plans or projects
507 exempted from such ceilings under subdivision (3) of this
508 subsection. For all redevelopment plans or projects
509 initially approved on or after August 28, 2018, at no time
510 shall a single redevelopment plan or project within such
511 redevelopment plan receive an appropriation under this
512 section that exceeds three million dollars annually;
513 (5) Redevelopment plans and projects receiving new
514 state revenues shall have a duration of up to fifteen years,
515 unless prior approval for a longer term is given by the
516 director of the department of economic development or his or
517 her designee and the commissioner of the office of
518 administration or his or her designee; except that, in no
519 case shall the duration exceed twenty-three years.
520 11. In addition to the areas authorized in subsection
521 9 of this section, the funding authorized pursuant to
522 subsection 4 of this section shall also be available in a
523 federally approved levee district, where construction of a
524 levee begins after December 23, 1997, and which is contained
525 within a county of the first classification without a
526 charter form of government with a population between fifty
527 thousand and one hundred thousand inhabitants which contains
528 all or part of a city with a population in excess of four
529 hundred thousand or more inhabitants.
530 12. There is hereby established within the state
531 treasury a special fund to be known as the "Missouri
532 Supplemental Tax Increment Financing Fund", to be
533 administered by the department of economic development. The

SB 1070 31
534 department shall annually distribute from the Missouri
535 supplemental tax increment financing fund the amount of the
536 new state revenues as appropriated as provided in the
537 provisions of subsection 4 of this section if and only if
538 the conditions of subsection 10 of this section are met.
539 The fund shall also consist of any gifts, contributions,
540 grants or bequests received from federal, private or other
541 sources. Moneys in the Missouri supplemental tax increment
542 financing fund shall be disbursed per project pursuant to
543 state appropriations.
544 13. Redevelopment project costs may include, at the
545 prerogative of the state, the portion of salaries and
546 expenses of the department of economic development and the
547 department of revenue reasonably allocable to each
548 redevelopment project approved for disbursements from the
549 Missouri supplemental tax increment financing fund for the
550 ongoing administrative functions associated with such
551 redevelopment project. Such amounts shall be recovered from
552 new state revenues deposited into the Missouri supplemental
553 tax increment financing fund created under this section.
554 14. For redevelopment plans or projects approved by
555 ordinance that result in net new jobs from the relocation of
556 a national headquarters from another state to the area of
557 the redevelopment project, the economic activity taxes and
558 new state tax revenues shall not be based on a calculation
559 of the incremental increase in taxes as compared to the base
560 year or prior calendar year for such redevelopment project,
561 rather the incremental increase shall be the amount of total
562 taxes generated from the net new jobs brought in by the
563 national headquarters from another state. In no event shall
564 this subsection be construed to allow a redevelopment

SB 1070 32
565 project to receive an appropriation in excess of up to fifty
566 percent of the new state revenues.
567 15. Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to
568 the contrary, the adoption of any tax increment financing
569 authorized under sections 99.800 to 99.865 shall not
570 supersede, alter, or reduce in any way a property tax levied
571 under section 205.971.
1 208.009. 1. No individual who is not a United States
2 citizen or national of the United States shall be eligible
3 to receive food assistance through the Supplemental
4 Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), unless that individual
5 meets the definition of an eligible alien pursuant to 7
6 U.S.C. 2015(f) and meets the definition of a qualified alien
7 pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1641(b).
8 2. No individual who is not a United States citizen or
9 national of the United States shall be eligible to receive
10 medical assistance through MO HealthNet, unless that
11 individual meets the definition of an eligible alien
12 pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1396b(v) and meets the definition of a
13 qualified alien pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1641(b).
14 3. No alien unlawfully present in the United States
15 shall receive any state or local public benefit, except for
16 state or local public benefits that may be offered under 8
17 U.S.C. 1621(b). Nothing in this section shall be construed
18 to prohibit the rendering of emergency medical care,
19 prenatal care, services offering alternatives to abortion,
20 emergency assistance, or legal assistance to any person.
21 Not later than September 30 of each year, the director of MO
22 HealthNet shall provide to the governor, the speaker of the
23 house of representatives, and the president pro tempore of
24 the senate, a report detailing the total amount of funds
25 that were expended by health care providers in this state

SB 1070 33
26 over the previous fiscal year for the rendering of emergency
27 medical care, prenatal care, services offering alternatives
28 to abortion, or emergency assistance to aliens not lawfully
29 present in this country.
30 [2.] 4. As used in this section, "public benefit"
31 means any grant, contract, or loan provided by an agency of
32 state or local government; or any retirement, welfare,
33 health, disability, housing, or food assistance benefit
34 under which payments, assistance, credits, or reduced rates
35 or fees are provided. The term "public benefit" shall not
36 include postsecondary education public benefits as defined
37 in section 173.1110, any municipal permit, or contracts or
38 agreements between public utility providers and their
39 customers or unemployment benefits payable under chapter
40 288. The unemployment compensation program shall verify the
41 lawful presence of an alien for the purpose of determining
42 eligibility for benefits in accordance with its own
43 procedures.
44 [3.] 5. In addition to providing proof of other
45 eligibility requirements, at the time of application for any
46 state or local public benefit, an applicant [who is eighteen
47 years of age or older] shall provide affirmative proof [that
48 the applicant is] they are a United States citizen [or a
49 permanent resident of the United States or is lawfully
50 present in the United States], a United States national, or
51 an alien with eligible immigration status for public
52 benefits. Such affirmative proof shall include documentary
53 evidence recognized by the department of revenue when
54 processing an application for a driver's license, a Missouri
55 driver's license, as well as any document issued by the
56 federal government that confirms an alien's lawful presence
57 in the United States[. In processing applications for

SB 1070 34
58 public benefits, an employee of an agency of state or local
59 government shall not inquire about the legal status of a
60 custodial parent or guardian applying for a public benefit
61 on behalf of his or her dependent child who is a citizen or
62 permanent resident of the United States] and eligible alien
63 status for public benefits.
64 [4.] 6. An applicant who cannot provide the proof
65 required under this section at the time of application may
66 alternatively sign an affidavit under oath, attesting to
67 either United States citizenship or classification by the
68 United States as an alien lawfully admitted [for permanent
69 residence] that is eligible for public benefits, in order to
70 receive temporary benefits or a temporary identification
71 document as provided in this section. The affidavit shall
72 be on or consistent with forms prepared by the state or
73 local government agency administering the state or local
74 public benefits and shall include the applicant's Social
75 Security number or any applicable federal identification
76 number and an explanation of the penalties under state law
77 for obtaining public assistance benefits fraudulently.
78 [5.] 7. (1) An applicant who has provided the sworn
79 affidavit required under subsection [4] 6 of this section is
80 eligible to receive temporary public benefits as follows:
81 [(1)] (a) For the minimum period required under
82 federal law, or if no minimum period is established under
83 federal law, for ninety days or until such time that it is
84 determined that the applicant is not lawfully present in the
85 United States or otherwise ineligible for public benefits
86 due to immigration status, whichever is earlier; or
87 [(2)] (b) Indefinitely if the applicant provides a
88 copy of a completed application for a birth certificate that
89 is pending in Missouri or some other state. An extension

SB 1070 35
90 granted under this subsection shall terminate upon the
91 applicant's receipt of a birth certificate or a
92 determination that a birth certificate does not exist
93 because the applicant is not a United States citizen.
94 (2) Failure to submit acceptable documentation
95 establishing United States citizenship, United States
96 national status, or alien status eligible for such public
97 benefits within the temporary eligibility period shall
98 result in denial or termination of public benefits.
99 (3) No additional period of eligibility for temporary
100 benefits shall be granted to any applicant who has
101 previously been denied public benefits at any time due to a
102 failure to verify United States citizenship, United States
103 national status, or alien status eligible for such public
104 benefits.
105 [6.] 8. An applicant who is an alien shall not receive
106 any state or local public benefit unless the alien's lawful
107 presence in the United States is first verified by the
108 federal government. State and local agencies administering
109 public benefits in this state shall cooperate with the
110 United States Department of Homeland Security in achieving
111 verification of an alien's lawful presence in the United
112 States in furtherance of this section. The system utilized
113 [may] shall include, but not be limited to, the Systematic
114 Alien Verification for Entitlements Program operated by the
115 United States Department of Homeland Security. [After an
116 applicant's lawful presence in the United States has been
117 verified through the Systematic Alien Verification for
118 Entitlements Program, no additional verification is required
119 within the same agency of the state or local government.]
120 9. A match through any electronic or data verification
121 system shall not, by itself, be accepted as proof of

SB 1070 36
122 identity. Every applicant for public benefits shall be
123 required to provide documentary proof of United States
124 citizenship, United States national status, or alien status
125 eligible for such public benefits pursuant to subsection 5
126 of this section.
127 [7.] 10. The provisions of this section shall not be
128 construed to require any nonprofit organization duly
129 registered with the Internal Revenue Service to enforce the
130 provisions of this section, nor does it prohibit such an
131 organization from providing aid.
132 [8.] 11. Any agency that administers public benefits
133 shall provide assistance in obtaining appropriate
134 documentation to persons applying for public benefits who
135 sign the affidavit required by subsection [4] 6 of this
136 section stating they are eligible for such benefits but lack
137 the documents required under subsection [3] 5 of this
138 section.
139 12. The MO HealthNet division shall require a field
140 for citizenship or immigration status on all presumptive
141 eligibility applications. The division shall require
142 hospitals, clinics, and other qualified entities authorized
143 to conduct presumptive eligibility determinations to collect
144 and transmit attestations of citizenship or eligible
145 immigration status to the division. No presumptive
146 eligibility application shall be approved unless the
147 applicant certifies that they are a United States citizen,
148 United States national, or alien with eligible immigration
149 status for MO HealthNet.
150 13. Any agency that administers public benefits shall
151 verify that the applicant or enrollee of that public benefit
152 is a United States citizen, United States national, or an
153 eligible alien for such public benefit through the

SB 1070 37
154 Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program
155 operated by the United States Department of Homeland
156 Security and any other verification system at the time of
157 application, at each eligibility redetermination, and
158 whenever information is received indicating a change in
159 circumstances affecting eligibility related to citizenship
160 or immigration status.
161 (1) If verification confirms that an applicant or
162 enrollee is not lawfully present in the United States or no
163 longer qualifies pursuant to subsections 1, 2, or 3 of this
164 section, or any successor provision of state and federal
165 law, the agency that administers that public benefit shall
166 immediately terminate future benefits and initiate
167 disenrollment, except as otherwise permitted for temporary
168 benefits under subsection 6 of this section.
169 (2) If any agency that administers public benefits is
170 unable to determine an applicant's or enrollee's lawful
171 presence after a Systematic Alien Verification for
172 Entitlements Program query or other authorized verification,
173 the agency shall immediately suspend approval or
174 continuation of benefits and refer the case to the United
175 States Department of Homeland Security or other appropriate
176 federal agency for investigation and enforcement action. No
177 public benefits shall be paid or continued unless and until
178 lawful presence is conclusively verified, except as
179 otherwise permitted for temporary benefits under subsection
180 6 of this section.
181 (3) The appropriate agency for referral for an
182 applicant or enrollee for whom they were unable to verify
183 lawful presence shall include, but not be limited to, the
184 United States Department of Agriculture.

SB 1070 38
185 14. When administering SNAP benefits, the department
186 of social services shall:
187 (1) Consider the entire income and financial resources
188 of any individual rendered ineligible to receive SNAP
189 benefits under subsection 1 of this section when determining
190 the eligibility and benefit allotment of the household of
191 which such individual is a member; and
192 (2) Notwithstanding any options provided under 7 CFR
193 Section 273.11(c)(3), not prorate or exclude the income or
194 financial resources of ineligible individuals under
195 subsection 1 of this section. All such income and resources
196 shall be fully considered.
1 217.155. The director of the department of
2 corrections, in consultation with the commissioner of
3 administration, shall identify any property owned by the
4 state that could be used as a temporary detention center for
5 detaining any persons not lawfully present in this country.
1 285.530. 1. No business entity or employer shall
2 knowingly employ, hire for employment, or continue to employ
3 an unauthorized alien to perform work within the state of
4 Missouri.
5 2. As a condition for the award of any contract or
6 grant in excess of five thousand dollars by the state or by
7 any political subdivision of the state to a business entity,
8 or for any business entity receiving a state-administered or
9 subsidized tax credit, tax abatement, or loan from the
10 state, the business entity shall, by sworn affidavit and
11 provision of documentation, affirm its enrollment and
12 participation in a federal work authorization program with
13 respect to the employees working in connection with the
14 contracted services. Every such business entity shall also
15 sign an affidavit affirming that it does not knowingly

SB 1070 39
16 employ any person who is an unauthorized alien in connection
17 with the contracted services. Any entity contracting with
18 the state or any political subdivision of the state shall
19 only be required to provide the affidavits required in this
20 subsection to the state and any political subdivision of the
21 state with which it contracts, on an annual basis. During
22 or immediately after an emergency, the requirements of this
23 subsection that a business entity enroll and participate in
24 a federal work authorization program shall be suspended for
25 fifteen working days. As used in this subsection,
26 "emergency" includes the following natural and manmade
27 disasters: major snow and ice storms, floods, tornadoes,
28 severe weather, earthquakes, hazardous material incidents,
29 nuclear power plant accidents, other radiological hazards,
30 and major mechanical failures of a public utility facility.
31 3. All public employers and all private employers
32 whose annual gross revenue exceeds one hundred thousand
33 dollars shall enroll and actively participate in a federal
34 work authorization program.
35 4. [An] Any employer not required by subsection 3 of
36 this section may enroll and participate in a federal work
37 authorization program and shall verify the employment
38 eligibility of every employee in the employer's hire whose
39 employment commences after the employer enrolls in a federal
40 work authorization program. The employer shall retain a
41 copy of the dated verification report received from the
42 federal government. Any business entity that participates
43 in such program shall have an affirmative defense that such
44 business entity has not violated subsection 1 of this
45 section.
46 5. A general contractor or subcontractor of any tier
47 shall not be liable under sections 285.525 to 285.550 when

SB 1070 40
48 such general contractor or subcontractor contracts with its
49 direct subcontractor who violates subsection 1 of this
50 section, if the contract binding the contractor and
51 subcontractor affirmatively states that the direct
52 subcontractor is not knowingly in violation of subsection 1
53 of this section and shall not henceforth be in such
54 violation and the contractor or subcontractor receives a
55 sworn affidavit under the penalty of perjury attesting to
56 the fact that the direct subcontractor's employees are
57 lawfully present in the United States.
1 362.103. Every bank and trust company created under
2 the laws of this state shall maintain a monitoring program
3 for the purpose of monitoring transactions after their
4 execution for potential violations of the federal Bank
5 Secrecy Act, 31 U.S.C. Sections 5311 to 5330, as well as any
6 other activity the bank or trust company reasonably believes
7 reflects suspicious activity specifically involving any
8 suspected or actual alien unlawfully present in the United
9 States.
1 544.680. 1. During the initial appearance of a
2 defendant charged with the offense of trespass by an illegal
3 alien under section 577.678, the court shall make findings
4 as to whether or not the defendant is seeking asylum under
5 provisions of 8 U.S.C. Section 1158. If the court finds
6 that the defendant is legally seeking asylum, the charges
7 shall be dismissed and the defendant shall be released
8 unless the defendant is also charged with other pending
9 criminal offenses. If the court finds that the defendant is
10 not seeking asylum, then the court shall make findings as to
11 whether or not the defendant poses a danger to the
12 community. If the court finds that the defendant does not
13 pose a danger to the community, the defendant may be

SB 1070 41
14 released under such conditions as the court may impose. If
15 the court finds that the defendant does pose a danger to the
16 community, the defendant shall be denied bail entirely and
17 such defendant shall not be released from custody of the
18 jail of the county in which the case is to be tried until
19 discharged by due course of law. Prior to the initial
20 appearance of a defendant under this subsection, the law
21 enforcement agency detaining the defendant shall contact
22 United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement within the
23 Department of Homeland Security to give notice of the
24 initial appearance of the defendant. United States
25 Immigration and Customs Enforcement shall have two business
26 days after receiving notice to take custody of the defendant
27 and to execute an agreement with the department guaranteeing
28 to either deport the defendant to his country of origin or
29 maintain custody of the defendant until the defendant is
30 legally present in the United States. After two business
31 days, the initial appearance of the defendant under this
32 subsection may occur if the defendant has not been taken
33 into custody by United States Immigration and Customs
34 Enforcement.
35 2. Any person arrested for the offense of trespass by
36 an illegal alien under section 577.678 who is driving a
37 motor vehicle at the time of arrest shall have such motor
38 vehicle confiscated until such time as the person shall
39 prove to the satisfaction of the court that such person is
40 legally present in this country.
41 3. It is an affirmative defense that the defendant
42 engaged in the conduct constituting the offense of trespass
43 by an illegal alien under section 577.678 because he or she
44 was coerced to do so, by the use of, or threatened imminent
45 use of, unlawful physical force upon him or her or a third

SB 1070 42
46 person, which force or threatened force a person of
47 reasonable firmness in his or her situation would have been
48 unable to resist.
1 544.700. 1. For purposes of this section, the
2 following terms mean:
3 (1) "Federal immigration agency", the United States
4 Department of Justice and the United States Department of
5 Homeland Security, a division within such an agency,
6 including United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement
7 and United States Customs and Border Protection, any
8 successor agency, and any other federal agency charged with
9 the enforcement of immigration law;
10 (2) "Immigration detainer", a facially sufficient
11 written or electronic request issued by a federal
12 immigration agency using that agency's official form to
13 request that another law enforcement agency detain a person
14 based on probable cause to believe that the person to be
15 detained is a removable alien under federal immigration law,
16 including detainers issued pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Sections
17 1226 and 1357 along with a warrant described in paragraph
18 (c) of this subdivision. For purposes of this subsection, an
19 immigration detainer is deemed facially sufficient if:
20 (a) The federal immigration agency's official form is
21 complete and indicates on its face that the federal
22 immigration official has probable cause to believe that the
23 person to be detained is a removable alien under federal
24 immigration law; or
25 (b) The federal immigration agency's official form is
26 incomplete and fails to indicate on its face that the
27 federal immigration official has probable cause to believe
28 that the person to be detained is a removable alien under
29 federal immigration law, but is supported by an affidavit,

SB 1070 43
30 order, or other official documentation that indicates that
31 the federal immigration agency has probable cause to believe
32 that the person to be detained is a removable alien under
33 federal immigration law; and
34 (c) The federal immigration agency supplies with its
35 detention request a Form I-200 Warrant for Arrest of Alien
36 or a Form I-205 Warrant of Removal/Deportation or a
37 successor warrant or other warrant authorized by federal law;
38 (3) "Inmate", a person in the custody of a law
39 enforcement agency;
40 (4) "Law enforcement agency", an agency in this state
41 charged with enforcement of state, county, municipal, or
42 federal laws or with managing custody of detained persons in
43 this state and includes municipal police departments,
44 sheriffs’ offices, state police departments, state
45 university and college police departments, county jails, and
46 the department of corrections;
47 (5) "Local governmental entity", any county,
48 municipality, or other political subdivision of this state;
49 (6) "State entity", the state or any office, board,
50 bureau, commission, department, branch, division, or
51 institution thereof, including public institutions of higher
52 education.
53 2. (1) Consistent with all duties created in state
54 and federal law, state and local law enforcement agencies
55 and any official responsible for directing or supervising
56 such agency shall use best efforts to support the
57 enforcement of federal immigration law. This subsection
58 applies to an official, representative, agent, or employee
59 of the entity or agency only when he or she is acting within
60 the scope of his or her official duties or within the scope
61 of his or her employment.

SB 1070 44
62 (2) Except as otherwise expressly prohibited by
63 federal law, a state entity, local governmental entity, or
64 law enforcement agency, or an employee, an agent, or a
65 representative of the entity or agency, may not prohibit or
66 in any way restrict a law enforcement agency from taking any
67 of the following actions with respect to information
68 regarding a person's immigration status:
69 (a) Sending the information to or requesting,
70 receiving, or reviewing the information from a federal
71 immigration agency for purposes of this section;
72 (b) Recording and maintaining the information for
73 purposes of this section;
74 (c) Exchanging the information with a federal
75 immigration agency or another state entity, local
76 governmental entity, or law enforcement agency for purposes
77 of this section;
78 (d) Using the information to comply with an
79 immigration detainer; and
80 (e) Using the information to confirm the identity of a
81 person who is detained by a law enforcement agency.
82 (3) A state entity, local governmental entity, or law
83 enforcement agency may not prohibit or in any way restrict a
84 law enforcement officer from executing or assisting in the
85 execution of a lawful judicial warrant. A law enforcement
86 officer shall make an arrest if a computer inquiry reveals a
87 facially sufficient detainer.
1 570.223. 1. A person commits the offense of identity
2 theft if he or she knowingly and with the intent to deceive
3 or defraud obtains, possesses, transfers, uses, or attempts
4 to obtain, transfer or use, one or more means of
5 identification not lawfully issued for his or her use.

SB 1070 45
6 2. The offense of identity theft is a class B
7 misdemeanor unless:
8 (1) The identity theft results in the theft or
9 appropriation of credit, money, goods, services, or other
10 property:
11 [(1)] (a) Not exceeding seven hundred fifty dollars in
12 value, in which case it is a class A misdemeanor;
13 [(2)] (b) Exceeding seven hundred fifty dollars and
14 not exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars in value, in
15 which case it is a class D felony;
16 [(3)] (c) Exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars and
17 not exceeding seventy-five thousand dollars in value, in
18 which case it is a class C felony;
19 [(4)] (d) Exceeding seventy-five thousand dollars in
20 value, in which case it is a class B felony;
21 (2) The identity theft is an attempt to provide proof
22 of identity to a prospective or current employer of the
23 person, to a financial institution, or to a public utility,
24 in which case it is a class E felony.
25 3. In addition to the provisions of subsection 2 of
26 this section, the court may order that the defendant make
27 restitution to any victim of the offense. Restitution may
28 include payment for any costs, including attorney fees,
29 incurred by the victim:
30 (1) In clearing the credit history or credit rating of
31 the victim; and
32 (2) In connection with any civil or administrative
33 proceeding to satisfy any debt, lien, or other obligation of
34 the victim arising from the actions of the defendant.
35 4. In addition to the criminal penalties in
36 subsections 2 and 3 of this section, any person who commits
37 an act made unlawful by subsection 1 of this section shall

SB 1070 46
38 be liable to the person to whom the identifying information
39 belonged for civil damages of up to five thousand dollars
40 for each incident, or three times the amount of actual
41 damages, whichever amount is greater. A person damaged as
42 set forth in subsection 1 of this section may also institute
43 a civil action to enjoin and restrain future acts that would
44 constitute a violation of subsection 1 of this section. The
45 court, in an action brought under this subsection, may award
46 reasonable attorneys' fees to the plaintiff.
47 5. If the identifying information of a deceased person
48 is used in a manner made unlawful by subsection 1 of this
49 section, the deceased person's estate shall have the right
50 to recover damages pursuant to subsection 4 of this section.
51 6. Civil actions under this section must be brought
52 within five years from the date on which the identity of the
53 wrongdoer was discovered or reasonably should have been
54 discovered.
55 7. Civil action pursuant to this section does not
56 depend on whether a criminal prosecution has been or will be
57 instituted for the acts that are the subject of the civil
58 action. The rights and remedies provided by this section
59 are in addition to any other rights and remedies provided by
60 law.
61 8. This section and section 570.224 shall not apply to
62 the following activities:
63 (1) A person obtains the identity of another person to
64 misrepresent his or her age for the sole purpose of
65 obtaining alcoholic beverages, tobacco, going to a gaming
66 establishment, or another privilege denied to minors;
67 (2) A person obtains means of identification or
68 information in the course of a bona fide consumer or
69 commercial transaction;

SB 1070 47
70 (3) A person exercises, in good faith, a security
71 interest or right of offset by a creditor or financial
72 institution;
73 (4) A person complies, in good faith, with any
74 warrant, court order, levy, garnishment, attachment, or
75 other judicial or administrative order, decree, or
76 directive, when any party is required to do so;
77 (5) A person is otherwise authorized by law to engage
78 in the conduct that is the subject of the prosecution.
79 9. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1)
80 or (2) of subsection 2 of this section, every person who has
81 previously been found guilty of identity theft or attempted
82 identity theft, and who subsequently is found guilty of
83 identity theft or attempted identity theft of credit, money,
84 goods, services, or other property not exceeding seven
85 hundred fifty dollars in value is guilty of a class E felony
86 and shall be punished accordingly.
87 10. If credit, property, or services are obtained by
88 two or more acts from the same person or location, or from
89 different persons by two or more acts which occur in
90 approximately the same location or time period so that the
91 identity thefts are attributable to a single scheme, plan,
92 or conspiracy, the acts may be considered as a single
93 identity theft and the value may be the total value of all
94 credit, property, and services involved.
1 577.678. 1. As used in this section, the following
2 terms mean:
3 (1) "Certified bounty hunter", a person who:
4 (a) Possesses a valid unexpired license as a bail bond
5 agent, general bail bond agent, or surety recovery agent
6 under sections 374.695 to 374.789; and

SB 1070 48
7 (b) Is certified under this section to find and detain
8 illegal aliens in this state;
9 (2) "Department", the department of public safety;
10 (3) "Illegal alien", a person who is eighteen years of
11 age or older and who is not lawfully present in the United
12 States as defined and described under 8 U.S.C. Section 1101,
13 et seq., as amended;
14 (4) "Life imprisonment", imprisonment for the duration
15 of a person's natural life;
16 (5) "Peace officer", as defined in section 590.010.
17 2. (1) A person commits the offense of trespass by an
18 illegal alien if such person:
19 (a) Is an illegal alien;
20 (b) Knowingly enters this state and remains in this
21 state; and
22 (c) Is physically present in this state at the time a
23 certified bounty hunter or a peace officer apprehends such
24 person.
25 (2) The offense of trespass by an illegal alien under
26 this section is a felony for which the authorized term of
27 imprisonment is life imprisonment without eligibility for
28 probation or conditional release. As an alternative to a
29 sentence of life imprisonment, the court may order that the
30 defendant be taken into the custody of Immigration and
31 Customs Enforcement, provided that such disposition shall
32 only be ordered if the department executes an agreement with
33 Immigration and Customs Enforcement guaranteeing that
34 Immigration and Customs Enforcement shall either deport the
35 defendant to his country of origin or maintain custody of
36 the defendant until such time as the defendant is legally
37 present in the United States.

SB 1070 49
38 (3) No person shall be arrested for the offense of
39 trespass by an illegal alien if such person legally entered
40 the country through a port of entry and possessed documents
41 indicating that the person was lawfully present in the
42 country when entering the country through the port of entry.
43 3. (1) A person who commits the offense of trespass
44 by an illegal alien shall be forever disqualified from:
45 (a) Registering and voting in any election under the
46 laws of this state;
47 (b) Securing any certificate or registration or
48 authority, permit, or license to drive under the laws of
49 this state;
50 (c) Applying for or receiving any state or local
51 public benefit offered by this state or a political
52 subdivision of this state; and
53 (d) Becoming a legal resident of this state.
54 (2) The provisions of this subsection shall become
55 effective as soon as technologically possible following the
56 development and maintenance of a modernized, integrated
57 system for the titling of vehicles, issuance and renewal of
58 vehicle registrations, issuance and renewal of driver's
59 licenses and identification cards, and perfection and
60 release of liens and encumbrances on vehicles, to be funded
61 by the motor vehicle administration technology fund as
62 created in section 301.558. Following the development of
63 the system, the director of the department of revenue shall
64 notify the governor, the secretary of state, and the revisor
65 of statutes, and the department of public safety shall
66 implement the provisions of this subsection.
67 4. Each person who is arrested under this section
68 shall provide a DNA sample under the same procedures for
69 collecting a DNA sample described in sections 650.050 to

SB 1070 50
70 650.060 and to the same officials described in section
71 650.055.
72 5. Subject to appropriations:
73 (1) (a) The department shall develop and maintain an
74 information system that operates at all times and provides
75 various means to receive and maintain reports of violations
76 of subsection 2 of this section;
77 (b) The various means of receiving such reports shall
78 include, but not be limited to, a toll-free telephone
79 hotline, email address, and online reporting portal. The
80 department shall periodically publicize the hotline
81 telephone number, email address, internet website address,
82 and any other means by which the department may receive such
83 reports;
84 (c) A person who makes a report under this section may
85 choose to remain anonymous until the person affirmatively
86 consents to having the person's identity disclosed;
87 (d) The information system shall be staffed by off-
88 duty peace officers, retired peace officers, and any other
89 peace officer deemed qualified by the department to staff
90 the information system;
91 (e) The hotline established under this subsection
92 shall also accept reports of sex and human trafficking. The
93 department shall establish guidelines for hotline operators
94 to utilize when responding to calls involving sex and human
95 trafficking, including the provision of resources for
96 victims of such trafficking;
97 (f) If an illegal alien is arrested and imprisoned
98 under this section as a result of a report to the
99 information system or a person is arrested and imprisoned
100 for a criminal offense involving sex or human trafficking as
101 a result of a report to the hotline, the person who made the

SB 1070 51
102 report shall be eligible to receive a reward of one thousand
103 dollars for providing such report; and
104 (g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
105 prohibit the commencement of a criminal action under section
106 575.080; and
107 (2) (a) The department shall develop and implement
108 the "Missouri Illegal Alien Certified Bounty Hunter
109 Program", which is hereby created to certify applicants to
110 the program as certified bounty hunters for purposes of
111 finding and detaining illegal aliens in this state under
112 this section;
113 (b) The program shall be administered by the
114 department under the following application and certification
115 procedures:
116 a. A person who possesses a valid unexpired license as
117 a bail bond agent, general bail bond agent, or surety
118 recovery agent under sections 374.695 to 374.789 may apply
119 to the department to be certified as a bounty hunter;
120 b. The department shall accept applications filed in
121 the manner established by rule and on a form prescribed by
122 the department. A completed application shall contain:
123 (i) The date the application was prepared;
124 (ii) The applicant's signature;
125 (iii) A copy of the person's valid unexpired license
126 as a bail bond agent, general bail bond agent, or surety
127 recovery agent under sections 374.695 to 374.789;
128 (iv) A mailing address where the applicant can be
129 contacted by the department for purposes of receiving first
130 class mail, legal documents, and certified mail;
131 (v) A telephone number or numbers where the applicant
132 can be called by the department;

SB 1070 52
133 (vi) Certification that the applicant has successfully
134 completed the training prescribed in subdivision (4) of
135 subsection 9 of this section; and
136 (vii) Other information deemed necessary by the
137 department; and
138 (c) Upon receipt of a completed application, the
139 department may certify the applicant as a bounty hunter.
140 The term of certification shall be for four years following
141 the date of initial certification unless the applicant
142 withdraws the certification or the department cancels the
143 certification before such date. The department shall notify
144 each certified bounty hunter of the certification's
145 expiration and provide a renewal form to such certified
146 bounty hunter at least four weeks before such expiration.
147 (d) In addition to effecting the arrest of an illegal
148 alien under subsection 9 of this section, the department may
149 dispatch a certified bounty hunter to effect the arrest of a
150 person who has a warrant for his arrest for any offense
151 involving sex or human trafficking under chapter 566.
152 Certified bounty hunters shall only be permitted to view the
153 warrant, or any other information deemed necessary by the
154 department, and shall not be permitted to view any other
155 record that is permitted by state law to be viewed only by a
156 law enforcement agency officer or employee of a state agency.
157 6. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
158 the "Missouri Illegal Alien Certified Bounty Hunter Program
159 Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated by the
160 general assembly. The state treasurer shall be custodian of
161 the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180,
162 the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund
163 shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in
164 this fund shall be used solely to provide moneys to the

SB 1070 53
165 department for the implementation and administration of this
166 section.
167 (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
168 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
169 of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
170 general revenue fund.
171 (3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
172 fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
173 interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
174 credited to the fund.
175 7. The Missouri attorney general and the prosecuting
176 attorney or circuit attorney of each county shall prosecute
177 charges filed under this section.
178 8. The department may promulgate all necessary rules
179 and regulations for the administration of this section. Any
180 rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
181 section 536.010, that is created under the authority
182 delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
183 complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
184 chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
185 section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
186 powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
187 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
188 and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
189 then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
190 or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
191 9. Such rules and regulations promulgated by the
192 department shall provide that:
193 (1) All law enforcement agencies in this state shall
194 provide the department with any information requested
195 regarding illegal immigration matters in this state;

SB 1070 54
196 (2) All law enforcement agencies in this state and the
197 department shall cooperate with the Secretary of the
198 Department of Homeland Security in the identification,
199 apprehension, detention, or removal of aliens not lawfully
200 present in the United States pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Section
201 1357(g)(1)(B);
202 (3) The department, in cooperation with the Department
203 of Homeland Security, shall establish rules and regulations
204 regarding the method of investigating, verifying immigration
205 status, and executing arrest warrants of aliens not lawfully
206 present in the United States to ensure a safe and legal
207 process, which shall include:
208 (a) Only peace officers may inquire and investigate
209 into the status of an alien with permission from the
210 department in cooperation with the Department of Homeland
211 Security;
212 (b) Once the status of an alien is confirmed as being
213 unlawfully present in the United States, only the
214 department, or a peace officer at the direction of the
215 department, may seek a warrant;
216 (c) When a warrant is issued, the department shall
217 dispatch only licensed peace officers or certified bounty
218 hunters to effect the arrest. Certified bounty hunters
219 shall only be permitted to view the warrant, or any other
220 information deemed necessary by the department, and shall
221 not be permitted to view any other record that is permitted
222 by state law to be viewed only by a law enforcement agency
223 officer or employee of a state agency;
224 (d) Any local law enforcement officer who detains an
225 alien for the commission of any other criminal laws of this
226 state may execute an arrest warrant; and

SB 1070 55
227 (e) No peace officer of this state shall arrest an
228 alien for being unlawfully present in the United States
229 without a warrant, unless such peace officer witnesses the
230 alien in the commission of any other criminal laws of this
231 state. No peace officer of this state shall arrest an alien
232 for being unlawfully present in the United States without a
233 warrant based solely on a reasonable suspicion that the
234 alien is unlawfully present in the United States. The
235 department shall annually contact each law enforcement
236 agency in this state, in writing, to advise each agency that
237 it is prohibited to arrest an alien for being unlawfully
238 present in the United States without a warrant based solely
239 on a reasonable suspicion that the alien is unlawfully
240 present in the United States;
241 (4) The department shall establish a training program
242 for certified bounty hunters in order to qualify the
243 certified bounty hunters to perform the functions of an
244 immigration officer which shall include knowledge of, and
245 adherence to, federal law relating to federal immigration
246 laws pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Section 1357(g)(1) and (2). The
247 training program shall include a component that is at least
248 thirty days in length that encompasses and instructs bounty
249 hunters in aspects of the basic training of peace officers
250 that are necessary to carry out the duties of certified
251 bounty hunters in this section.
1 650.655. 1. The department shall be responsible for
2 coordinating all efforts among state departments, the
3 federal government, and all local governments to combat sex
4 and human trafficking. To the extent necessary, all state
5 departments shall cooperate with the department in any
6 requests for information or assistance.

SB 1070 56
7 2. The department shall establish guidelines for a
8 training program on sex and human trafficking for entities
9 listed in subsection 3 of this section. The training shall
10 be focused solely on identifying a potential victim of sex
11 or human trafficking and reporting such trafficking to the
12 hotline established in section 577.678.
13 3. The following entities shall be offered the
14 training guidelines established by the department in
15 subsection 2 of this section:
16 (1) The offices of all prosecuting and circuit
17 attorneys;
18 (2) Any person trained and authorized by law or rule
19 to render emergency medical assistance or treatment. Such
20 persons may include, but shall not be limited to, emergency
21 first responders, telecommunicator first responders, police
22 officers, sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, firefighters, emergency
23 medical technicians, registered nurses, or physicians;
24 (3) Juvenile officers under chapter 211;
25 (4) Teachers in any public school, public charter
26 school, and any private school; and
27 (5) Social workers licensed under sections 337.600 to
28 337.649.
29 4. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
30 the "Anti-Human Trafficking Training Fund", which shall
31 consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly. The
32 state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In
33 accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state
34 treasurer shall approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
35 dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in the fund
36 shall be used by the department solely to develop and
37 provide the training required by this section.

SB 1070 57
38 (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
39 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
40 of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
41 general revenue fund.
42 (3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
43 fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
44 interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
45 credited to the fund.
46 5. Any entity that receives public funds shall report
47 any data in the entity's possession regarding reports of sex
48 and human trafficking to the department within thirty days
49 of receiving the report, provided that no personally
50 identifiable information shall be included in the report.
51 The department shall annually compile a report of the data
52 received by the department under this subsection. The
53 report shall not contain any personally identifiable
54 information, but the report shall contain aggregate data by
55 county of such information received by the department. The
56 annual report shall be available to the public on the
57 department's website and shall be submitted to the president
58 pro tempore of the senate and the speaker of the house of
59 representatives.
1 650.660. 1. (1) There is hereby created in the state
2 treasury the "Rapid Response for Victims of Sex and Human
3 Trafficking Fund", which shall consist of moneys
4 appropriated by the general assembly. The state treasurer
5 shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections
6 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer shall approve
7 disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon
8 appropriation, moneys in the fund shall be used by the
9 department solely to carry out the provisions of this
10 section.

SB 1070 58
11 (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
12 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
13 of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
14 general revenue fund.
15 (3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
16 fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
17 interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
18 credited to the fund.
19 2. (1) Moneys in the fund shall be distributed by the
20 department to hospitals licensed under chapter 197 that
21 provide rapid response intake and intervention for victims
22 of sex and human trafficking.
23 (2) In order to qualify for a disbursement of moneys
24 from the fund, a licensed hospital shall meet the following
25 requirements:
26 (a) Dedicate a sufficient number of patient rooms for
27 victims of sex and human trafficking;
28 (b) Maintain staff that allow for the intake of
29 victims of sex and human trafficking to occur twenty-four
30 hours a day, seven days a week;
31 (c) Provide personnel to ensure that the area within
32 the hospital in which victims of sex and human trafficking
33 are located is secure from entry by non-hospital personnel;
34 (d) Provide specialized medical care to the victims of
35 sex and human trafficking, including, but not limited to,
36 mental health assessments, management of any drug or alcohol
37 withdrawal symptoms, treatment of any physical wounds, as
38 well as coordination with state and local agencies to ensure
39 that the victims of sex and human trafficking receive any
40 necessary resources for their long-term placement into safe
41 housing; and

SB 1070 59
42 (e) Appropriate staff of the hospital providing
43 services to victims of sex and human trafficking shall have
44 received training on recognizing the signs of sex and human
45 trafficking as well as training on the methods of conducting
46 trauma-informed investigations of alleged sex and human
47 trafficking.
48 3. The department may promulgate rules to carry out
49 the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
50 rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
51 created under the authority delegated in this section shall
52 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
53 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
54 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
55 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
56 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
57 the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
58 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
59 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
60 August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓